Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 4. Taxes and Assessments

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-3-770.
Methods of levying and collecting; classifications generally.

In addition to the other means of providing revenue for such districts as herein provided, the board shall have power and authority to levy and collect taxes and special assessments for maintaining and operating such works and paying the obligations and indebtedness of the district by any one (1) or more of the methods or combinations thereof, classified as follows:

Class A. — To levy and collect taxes upon all property within the district as hereinafter provided;

Class B. — To levy and collect assessments for special benefits accruing to property within municipalities for which use of water is allotted as hereinafter provided;

Class C. — To levy and collect assessments for special benefits accruing to lands within irrigation districts for which use of water is allotted as hereinafter provided;

Class D. — To levy and collect assessments for special benefits accruing to lands for which use of water is allotted as hereinafter provided.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 41-108.

Cross references. —

As to surplus funds, see §

41-3-748

.

As to bonds, see §§

41-3-753

through

41-3-757

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-3-771.
Methods of levying and collecting; class A.

To levy and collect taxes under class A as provided in W.S.

41-3-770

, the board shall, in each year, determine the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation, taking into consideration other sources of revenue of the district, and shall fix a rate of levy which when levied upon every dollar of assessed valuation of property within the district, and with other revenues will raise the amount required by the district, to supply funds for paying expenses of organization, for surveys and plans, paying the costs of construction, operating and maintaining the works of the district; provided, however, that said rate shall not exceed one-half (1/2) mill on the dollar, prior to the delivery of water from the works, and thereafter not to exceed one (1) mill on the dollar, of assessed valuation of the property within the district, except in the event of accruing defaults and/or deficiencies where an additional levy may be made as provided in W.S.

41-3-775

. The board shall on or before the third Monday of July of each year, certify to the board of county commissioners of each county within the district or having a portion of its territory in the district, the rate so fixed with direction that at the time and in the manner required by law for levying of taxes for county purposes, such board of county commissioners shall levy such tax upon the assessed valuation of all property within the district, in addition to such other taxes as may be levied by such board of county commissioners, at the rate so fixed and determined; provided, however, that said assessment and tax levied under the provisions of this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] shall not be construed as being a part of the general county mill levy.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 41-109.

§ 41-3-772.
Methods of levying and collecting; class B.

To levy and collect special assessments under class B as provided in W.S.

41-3-770

, the board shall make an allotment of water to each petitioning municipality in the district in the manner as hereinafter provided, in such quantity as will in the judgment of the board, when added to the then present supply of water of such municipality, make an adequate supply for such municipality, and shall fix and determine the rate or rates per acre-foot, and terms at and upon which such water shall be sold, leased, or otherwise disposed of, for use by such municipalities; provided, however, that such rates shall be equitable although not necessarily equal or uniform for like classes of services throughout the district. In the event any city, city and county, or town shall desire to purchase, lease or otherwise obtain the beneficial use of waters of the district for domestic or irrigation purposes, the legislative body of such municipality shall by ordinance authorize and direct its mayor and clerk to petition the board for an allotment of water, upon terms prescribed by the board, which petition shall contain inter alia, the following:

Name of municipality;

Quantity of water to be purchased or otherwise acquired;

Price per acre-foot to be paid;

Whether payments are to be in cash or annual installments;

Agreement by the municipality to make payments for the beneficial use of such water together with annual maintenance and operating charges and to be bound by the provisions of this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] and the rules and regulations of the board.

The secretary of the board shall cause notice of the filing of such petition to be given and published once each week for two (2) successive weeks, in a newspaper published in the county in which said municipality is situated, which notice shall state the filing of such petition and giving notice to all persons interested to appear at the office of the board, at a time named in said notice and show cause, in writing, if any they have, why the petition should not be granted.

The board at the time and place mentioned in said notice or at such time or times at which the hearing of said petition may adjourn, shall proceed to hear the petition and objections thereto, presented, in writing, by any person showing cause as aforesaid why said petition should not be granted. The failure of any person interested to show cause in writing, as aforesaid, shall be deemed and taken as an assent on his part to the granting of said petition. The board may at its discretion, accept or reject the said petition, but if it deems it for the best interest of the district that said petition be granted, shall enter an order granting the said petition and from and after such order the said municipality shall be deemed to have purchased, leased, or otherwise acquired the beneficial use of water as set forth in said order. If said petition is granted, the board shall, in each year, determine the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation from property within such municipality to pay the annual installments and a fair proportionate amount of estimated operating and maintenance charges for the next succeeding year as provided in the order granting said petition, and prepare a statement showing the tax rate to be applied to all property in such municipality, which rate shall be the rate fixed by resolution of the board modified to the extent necessary to produce from each such municipality only the amount of money apportioned thereto in said resolution, less any amount paid or undertaken to be paid by such municipality in cash or as credited thereto by payments from the general funds of such municipality. Upon receipt by the board of county commissioners of each county, wherein such municipality is located, of a certified copy of such resolution showing the tax rate to be applied to all property in each municipality and showing the municipalities and the property which is exempt therefrom, if any, it shall be the duty of the county officers to levy and collect such tax in addition to such other tax as may be levied by such board of county commissioners at the rate so fixed and determined.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 41-110.

§ 41-3-773.
Methods of levying and collecting; class C.

To levy and collect special assessments upon lands under class C as provided in W.S.

41-3-770

, the board shall make an allotment of water to each of the petitioning irrigation districts within the district in the manner as hereinafter provided in such quantity as will in the judgment of the board, when added to the present supply of water of such irrigation district, make an adequate supply of water for such irrigation district, and shall fix and determine the rate or rates per acre-foot and terms at and upon which water shall be sold, leased, or otherwise disposed of to such irrigation district; provided, however, that such rates shall be equitable although not necessarily equal or uniform for like classes of services throughout the district. In the event any irrigation district shall desire to purchase, lease or otherwise obtain the beneficial use of waters of the district, the board of such irrigation district shall by resolution authorize and direct its president and secretary to petition the board for an allotment of water, upon terms prescribed by the board, which petition shall contain inter alia, the following:

Name of irrigation district;

Quantity of water to be purchased or otherwise acquired;

Price per acre-foot to be paid;

Whether payments are to be made in cash or annual installments;

Agreement by such irrigation district to make payments for the beneficial use of such water, together with annual maintenance and operating charges, and to be bound by the provision of this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] and the rules and regulations of the board.

The secretary of the board shall cause notice of the filing of such petition to be given and published, which notice shall state the filing of such petition and giving notice to all persons interested to appear at the office of the board at a time named in said notice and show cause in writing, if any they have, why the petition should not be granted. The board at the time and place mentioned in said notice, or at such times at which the hearing of said petition may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the petition and objections thereto, presented, in writing, by any person showing cause as aforesaid why said petition should not be granted. The failure of any person interested to show cause, in writing, as aforesaid, shall be deemed and taken as an assent on his part to the granting of said petition. The board may, at its discretion, accept or reject the said petition, but if it deems it for the best interest of the district that said petition shall be granted, shall enter an order to that effect granting the said petition and from and after such order, the irrigation district and/or persons therein shall be deemed to have purchased, leased, or otherwise acquired the beneficial use of water as set forth in said order. If said petition is granted, the board shall, in each year, determine the amount of money necessary to be raised by special assessment on lands within such irrigation district and shall certify to the board of county commissioners of the county in which the lands of such irrigation district are located the amount of the assessment, plus a fair proportionate amount of the estimated operating and maintenance charges for the next succeeding year on each tract of land on or before the third Monday in July of each year. Thereupon the county commissioners shall certify to and deliver said assessment roll to the county assessor of such county and such county assessor shall extend the amount of such special assessment, plus said operating and maintenance charges, on the tax roll as a special assessment against the lands upon which said special assessment is made. If a subdistrict or subdistricts are organized as herein provided, assessments of special benefits shall be made, spread on the tax rolls and collected in the same manner provided in the case of irrigation districts. A district may elect to establish the special assessment, operating and maintenance amount and due date after the third Monday of July and on or before the third Monday of October, provided the district shall be responsible for the billing and collection of special assessments, operating and maintenance charges.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 41-111; Laws 2010, ch. 19, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added the last sentence in (b).

§ 41-3-774.
Method of levying and collecting; class D.

To levy and collect special assessments upon lands under class D as provided in W.S.

41-3-770

, the board shall make an allotment of water to petitioning owners of lands in the district, upon which water can be beneficially used in the manner as hereinafter provided, in such amount as will, in the judgment of the board, together with the present supply of water for irrigation purposes on such lands, make an adequate water supply for irrigation of such lands, and shall fix and determine the rate or rates per acre-foot and the terms at and upon which water shall be sold, leased or otherwise disposed of, for use on said lands. In the event that any person or private corporation shall elect to purchase, lease or otherwise obtain the beneficial use of waters of the district for irrigation of lands, such person or corporation shall petition the board for an allotment of water upon terms prescribed by the board, which petition shall contain inter alia, the following:

Name of applicant;

Quantity of water to be purchased or otherwise acquired;

Description of lands upon which the water will be used and attached;

Price per acre-foot to be paid;

Whether payment will be made in cash or annual installments;

Agreement that the annual installments and the charges for maintenance and operating shall become a tax lien upon the lands for which such water is petitioned and allotted and to be bound by the provision of this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] and the rules and regulations of the board.

The board may, in its discretion, accept or reject the said petition, but if it deems it for the best interests of the district that said petition be granted, shall enter an order granting the said petition and from and after such order, the said petitioner shall have deemed to have agreed to the purchase, lease or other means of acquiring the beneficial use of water under the terms set forth in said petition and order. Such order shall provide for payment on the basis of rate per acre-foot of water allotted to said lands within the district, providing that the board may divide the district into units and fix a different rate per acre-foot of water in the respective units and provided, further, that such rates shall be equitable although not necessarily equal or uniform for like classes of services through the district.

The secretary of the board shall cause notice of the filing of such petition to be given and published, which notice shall state the filing of such petition and giving notice to all persons interested to appear at the office of the board at a time named in said notice and show cause in writing, if any they have, why the petition should not be granted. The board at the time and place mentioned in said notice, or at such time or times at which the hearing on said petition may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the petition and objections thereto, presented, in writing, by any person showing cause as aforesaid, why said petition should not be granted. The failure of any person interested to show cause, in writing, as aforesaid, shall be deemed and taken as an assent on his part to the granting of said petition. The board may, at its discretion, accept or reject the said petition, but if it deems it for the best interest of the district that said petition shall be granted, shall enter an order to that effect granting said petition, and from and after such order the petitioner and/or persons interested therein, shall be deemed to have purchased, leased or otherwise acquired the beneficial use of water as set forth in said order. If such petition is granted, the board shall cause a certified copy of the order granting said petition to be recorded in the county in which said lands are located and thereafter, the annual installments and annual operating and maintenance charges shall be a perpetual tax lien upon such lands. The board shall on or before the third Monday in July of each year, certify to the board of county commissioners of the county within the district in which such lands are located the amount of the annual installments, plus a fair proportionate amount of the estimated operating and maintenance charges apportioned to said lands for the next succeeding year. Thereupon, the county commissioners shall certify to and deliver said assessment roll to the county assessor of such county and such county assessor shall extend the amount so certified on the tax roll as a flat special assessment against the lands for which such water is petitioned and allowed.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 41-112.

§ 41-3-775.
Considerations affecting annual levies and assessments; deficiencies; additional assessments.

The board in making the annual assessments and levies as herein provided, shall take into account the maturing indebtedness for the ensuing year as provided in its contracts and/or the maturing of bonds and interest on all bonds, and deficiencies and defaults of prior years, and shall make ample provision for the payment thereof. In case the proceeds of such levies and assessments made under the provisions of this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

], together with other revenues of the district, are not sufficient to punctually pay the annual installments on its contracts and/or bonds, and interest thereon and to pay defaults and deficiencies, then the board shall make such additional levies of taxes and/or assessments as may be necessary for such purposes and notwithstanding any limitations by contract, order, tax lien, or otherwise, such taxes and assessments shall be made to continue until the indebtedness of the district shall be fully paid; provided, however, that the amount of such additional levies of taxes under class A as provided in W.S.

41-3-770

, shall not in any one (1) year exceed an amount that would be raised by a levy of one-half (1/2) mill against the assessed value of such property as fixed for general tax purposes; provided, that such levies for defaults and deficiencies shall not at any time be so made as to impose upon class A as herein provided, payments in excess of twenty-five percent (25%) of the anticipated revenue from all sources to be raised for the specific purpose of payment of existing defaults and deficiencies; and provided further, that in making such additional levies and/or assessments, the board shall take into account all sources of revenue and equitably distribute the burden of such defaults and deficiencies according to the uses and benefits as provided in this act.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 41-113.

§ 41-3-776.
Objections to assessments.

Prior to the third Monday in July of each year in which assessments are made, the board shall appoint a time and place or places where it will meet within the district for the purposes of hearing objections to assessments and prior notice of such hearing shall be given by publication in two (2) issues a week apart, in some newspaper of general circulation published in each county; provided that if there is any county in the district in which there is no newspaper published, then such notice shall be published in an adjoining county. Said notice shall notify the owners of property in the district that in the secretary’s office may be found and examined a description of the property so assessed, the amount of the assessment thereon fixed by the board, and the time and place or places fixed by the board for the hearing of objections to such assessments. It shall not be necessary for said notice to contain separate descriptions of the lots or tracts of real estate, but it shall be sufficient if the notice shall contain such descriptions as will inform the owner whether or not his real estate is covered by such descriptions, and to inform the owners where can be found of record the amount of assessments. If in the opinion of any person whose property is assessed, his property has been assessed too high, or has been erroneously or illegally assessed, he may at any time before the date of such hearing, file written objections to such assessments, stating the grounds of such objections, which statement shall be verified by the affidavit of said person or his agent. In such hearing the board shall hear such evidence and arguments as may be offered concerning the correctness or legality of such assessment and may modify or amend the same. Any owner of property desiring to appeal from the findings of the board as to assessment shall, within thirty (30) days from the finding of the board, file with the clerk of the court a written notice making demand for trial by the court. The appellant at the same time shall file a bond with good and sufficient security to be approved by the clerk of said court in the sum not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200.00) to the effect that if the finding of the court be not more favorable to the appellant than the finding of the board, the appellant will pay the cost of the appeal. The appellant shall state definitely from what part of the order the appeal is taken. In case more than one (1) appeal is taken, the court may upon its showing that the same may be consolidated without injury to the interests of any one, consolidate and try the same together.

The court shall not disturb the findings of the board unless the findings of the board in any case are manifestly disproportionate to the assessments imposed upon other property in the district created under this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

]. The trial shall be to the court and the matter shall take precedence before the court and shall be taken up as promptly as may be after the appeal is filed. If no appeal is taken from the findings of the board within the time prescribed in this section, or after the finding of the court in case an appeal is taken from the findings of the board, then the assessment shall be final and conclusive evidence that said assessments have been made in proportion to the benefits conferred upon the property in said district by reason of the improvements to be constructed under the provisions of this act and such assessments shall constitute a perpetual lien upon such property so assessed until paid.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 41-114.

Cross references. —

As to actions to enjoin collection of or to recover back taxes, see §

39-13-109

.

§ 41-3-777.
Duties of city and county taxing officials.

It shall be the duty of the officer or body having authority to levy taxes within each county, city and county, or town, to levy the taxes and special assessments as provided in this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] and it shall be the duty of all county, or city and county officials, charged with the duty of collecting taxes, to collect such taxes and special assessments in the time, form and manner and with like interest and penalties as county or city and county taxes are collected and when collected to pay the same to the district, ordering its levy and/or collection, and the payment of such collections shall be made through the secretary of the district and paid into the depository thereof to the credit of the district. All taxes and assessments made under this act together with all interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs in collection of the same, shall, until paid, constitute a perpetual lien on a parity with the tax lien of general, state, county, city, town or school taxes and no sale of such property to enforce any general, state, county, city, town or school tax or other liens shall extinguish the perpetual lien of such taxes and assessments.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 41-115.

§ 41-3-778.
Exemptions.

All property of whatever kind and nature owned by the state and by towns, cities, school districts, drainage districts, irrigation districts, park districts, water districts, or any other governmental agency or agencies within the said district, shall be exempt from assessment and levy by the board as provided in this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] for the purposes herein contained.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 41-116.

§ 41-3-779.
Nonpayment.

If the taxes and/or assessments levied are not paid as herein provided, then the real property shall be sold at the regular tax sale for the payment of such taxes and assessments, interest and penalties, in the manner provided by the statutes of the state of Wyoming for selling property for nonpayment of general taxes. If there are no bids at said tax sale for the property so offered under class A and class B, said property shall be struck off to the county, and the county shall account to the district in the same manner as provided by law for accounting for school, town and city taxes. And if there are no bids for the property so offered under class C and class D, said property shall be struck off to the district and the tax certificate shall be issued in the name of the district and the board shall have the same power with reference to sale of said tax certificate, as now vested in county commissioners and county treasurer when property is struck off to the counties.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 41-117.